Colorado, session 2026A, HB1147.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Within the continuum of individual residential services and
supports settings, host homes are a specific type of supported living
arrangement in which an individual with intellectual and developmental
disabilities resides in the private residence of a host home provider whose
home is under contract with a service provider agency to deliver individual
residential services and supports;
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(b) Host homes are a subset of individual residential services and
supports settings;
(c) Individual residential services and supports are home- and
community-based service benefits available under the home- and
community-based services waiver administered by the Colorado department
of health care policy and financing;
(d) Individual residential services and supports are designed to
ensure that individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities
receive residential supports that promote individualized guidance,
habilitation, community inclusion, and health and safety in home settings;
(e) Individual residential services and supports include a variety of
residential arrangements, including service provider agency-owned or
leased homes and host homes, among other arrangements, to meet the
unique needs and preferences of participants;
(f) The diversity of individual residential services and supports
settings, including host homes and other residential options, reflects the
state's commitment to person-centered choice, integration in community
life, and compliance with the federal home- and community-based services
rules that prohibit institutionalization and support community-based
placement;
(g) While individual residential services and supports settings,
including host homes, currently operate under regulatory oversight, there
are identified needs for enhanced tracking, monitoring, and coordination to
ensure consistent compliance with health, safety, and quality standards and
to provide appropriate protections for participants across all settings;
(h) Further, the Colorado department of health care policy and
financing must allow for appropriate parties to access relevant information
in order to enable a more informed choice by participants or potential
participants and their families, advocates, and other interested parties;
(i) The Colorado department of health care policy and financing and
the Colorado department of public health and environment must coordinate
to establish standardized requirements for the oversight of host homes and
other individual residential services and supports settings, including
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1147

inspection frequency, reporting mechanisms, data sharing, and corrective
action processes where appropriate; and
(j) This coordinated oversight framework is necessary to strengthen
accountability, ensure health and safety outcomes for home- and
community-based services waiver participants, support compliance with
state and federal home- and community-based services rules, and promote
transparency for individuals, families, providers, and stakeholders.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 25.5-6-415 as
follows:
25.5-6-415. Individual residential services and supports settings
for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities - statewide
database - risk criteria - complaint process - rules - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "INDIVIDUAL RESIDENTIAL SERVICES AND SUPPORTS" MEANS THE
RESIDENTIAL SERVICES PROVIDED BY A SERVICE PROVIDER AGENCY TO NO
MORE THAN THREE INDIVIDUALS WITHIN ONE RESIDENCE.
(b) "INDIVIDUAL RESIDENTIAL SERVICES AND SUPPORTS SETTING"
MEANS A COMMUNITY LIVING RESIDENTIAL SETTING IN WHICH INDIVIDUAL
RESIDENTIAL SERVICES AND SUPPORTS ARE PROVIDED TO NO MORE THAN
THREE PERSONS WITH INTELLECTUAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
AND FOR WHICH A STATE LICENSE IS NOT REQUIRED.
(c) "SERVICE PROVIDER AGENCY" MEANS AN ORGANIZATION
APPROVED BY THE STATE DEPARTMENT TO PROVIDE OVERSIGHT AND
SUPPORT TO AN INDIVIDUAL RESIDENTIAL SERVICES AND SUPPORTS SETTING
TO ENSURE THAT THE CAREGIVERS MEET STATE STANDARDS FOR HEALTH,
SAFETY, AND QUALITY OF CARE.
(2) (a) THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH A STATEWIDE
DATABASE TO ENHANCE THE TRANSPARENCY OF COLORADO'S INDIVIDUAL
RESIDENTIAL SERVICES AND SUPPORTS NETWORK. THE PURPOSE OF THE
STATEWIDE DATABASE IS TO PROVIDE ACCURATE INFORMATION ABOUT
CERTAIN INDIVIDUAL RESIDENTIAL SERVICES AND SUPPORTS SETTINGS AND
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1147

THEIR ASSOCIATED SERVICE PROVIDER AGENCIES.
(b) THE DATABASE IS FOR USE BY THE STATE DEPARTMENT, THE
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT, AND SERVICE
PROVIDER AGENCIES.
(c) THE DATABASE MUST INCLUDE INFORMATION ON INDIVIDUAL
RESIDENTIAL SERVICES AND SUPPORTS SETTINGS. THE STATE DEPARTMENT
SHALL DETERMINE WHAT INFORMATION MUST BE COLLECTED ON EACH
INDIVIDUAL RESIDENTIAL SERVICES AND SUPPORTS SETTING TYPE FOR
INCLUSION IN THE DATABASE. AT A MINIMUM, EACH SERVICE PROVIDER
AGENCY MUST SUBMIT THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION FOR EACH COVERED
INDIVIDUAL RESIDENTIAL SERVICES AND SUPPORTS SETTING THAT THE
SERVICE PROVIDER AGENCY OVERSEES:
(I) THE NAME AND CONTACT INFORMATION OF THE INDIVIDUAL
RESIDENTIAL SERVICES AND SUPPORTS SETTING, IF APPLICABLE;
(II) THE ADDRESS AND LOCATION OF THE INDIVIDUAL RESIDENTIAL
SERVICES AND SUPPORTS SETTING;
(III) THE NAME OF EACH SERVICE PROVIDER AGENCY THAT THE
INDIVIDUAL RESIDENTIAL SERVICES AND SUPPORTS SETTING IS CURRENTLY
ASSOCIATED WITH AND THE SERVICE PROVIDER AGENCY'S CONTACT
INFORMATION; AND
(IV) WHEN APPLICABLE, THE NAME OF EACH SERVICE PROVIDER
AGENCY THAT THE INDIVIDUAL RESIDENTIAL SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
SETTING CONTRACTED WITH IN THE PREVIOUS FIVE YEARS AND EACH
SERVICE PROVIDER AGENCY'S CONTACT INFORMATION.
(d) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, AND QUARTERLY THEREAFTER, A
SERVICE PROVIDER AGENCY SHALL SUBMIT THE INFORMATION DETAILED IN
SUBSECTION (2)(c) OF THIS SECTION TO THE STATE DEPARTMENT.
(e) BEGINNING AUGUST 1, 2026, AND QUARTERLY THEREAFTER, THE
STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL UPDATE THE DATABASE TO ACCURATELY
REFLECT THE INFORMATION SUBMITTED BY A SERVICE PROVIDER AGENCY,
AS REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (2)(d) OF THIS SECTION. THE STATE
DEPARTMENT SHALL UPDATE THE DATABASE WITHIN ONE MONTH AFTER
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1147

RECEIVING THE INFORMATION DETAILED IN SUBSECTION (2)(c) OF THIS
SECTION.
(f) THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL DETERMINE THE CIRCUMSTANCES
IN WHICH INFORMATION FROM THE DATABASE MAY BE SHARED WITH
MEMBERS OF THE PUBLIC, CONSISTENT WITH ALL APPLICABLE STATE AND
FEDERAL PRIVACY AND CONFIDENTIALITY LAWS.
(g) IDENTIFYING INFORMATION FROM RESIDENTIAL HOMES WHERE
RESIDING INDIVIDUALS RECEIVE RESIDENTIAL SERVICES AND SUPPORTS FROM
A FAMILY MEMBER SHALL NOT BE SHARED WITH THE PUBLIC.
(h) INFORMATION FROM THE DATABASE MAY BE PROVIDED TO
APPROPRIATE AND AUTHORIZED PARTIES BY THE SERVICE PROVIDER AGENCY
WHEN CONSIDERING POTENTIAL PLACEMENT.
(5) THE STATE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT RULES, AS NECESSARY, TO
CARRY OUT THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(6) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO REDUCE,
LIMIT, OR OTHERWISE DIMINISH THE RIGHTS OF INDIVIDUALS RECEIVING
INTELLECTUAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITY SERVICES, INCLUDING THE
RIGHT TO INFORMED CHOICE OF SETTING CONSISTENT WITH FEDERAL HOME-
AND COMMUNITY-BASED SERVICES REQUIREMENTS.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-10-202, amend
(22); and add (21.5) as follows:
25.5-10-202. Definitions.
As used in this article 10, unless the context otherwise requires:
(21.5) "INDIVIDUAL RESIDENTIAL SERVICES AND SUPPORTS" HAS THE
MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION 25.5-6-415.
(22) "Independent residential support services" means a community
living situation, defined by rule of the state board, in which services and
supports are provided to no more than three persons with intellectual and
developmental disabilities and for which a state license is not required.
"INDIVIDUAL RESIDENTIAL SERVICES AND SUPPORTS SETTING" HAS THE
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1147

MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION 25.5-6-415.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-10-214, amend
(1) as follows:
25.5-10-214. Community residential home - licenses - rules.
(1) The department of public health and environment and the state
department shall implement a system of joint licensure and certification of
community residential homes. Independent residential support services
INDIVIDUAL RESIDENTIAL SERVICES AND SUPPORTS provided by the state
department do not require licensure by the department of public health and
environment. AN INDIVIDUAL RESIDENTIAL SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
SETTING MUST BE TREATED AS RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY IN THE APPLICATION
OF LOCAL REGULATIONS, INCLUDING ZONING, LAND USE DEVELOPMENT, FIRE
AND LIFE SAFETY, SANITATION, AND BUILDING CODES. LOCAL GOVERNING
AUTHORITIES SHALL NOT IMPOSE ADDITIONAL REGULATIONS ON AN
INDIVIDUAL RESIDENTIAL SERVICES AND SUPPORTS SETTING THAT DO NOT
APPLY TO OTHER RESIDENTIAL PROPERTIES.
SECTION 5. Appropriation. (1) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year,
$20,000 is appropriated to the department of health care policy and
financing for use by the executive director's office. This appropriation is
from the general fund. To implement this act, the office may use this
appropriation for general professional services and special projects.
(2) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year, the general assembly
anticipates that the department of health care policy and financing will
receive $60,000 in federal funds for the executive director's office to
implement this act. The appropriation in subsection (1) of this section is
based on the assumption that the office will receive this amount of federal
funds, which is subject to the "(I)" notation as defined in the annual general
appropriation act for the same fiscal year.
SECTION 6. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1147

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1147